Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.150

Possessing stolen property in the first degree—Other than firearm or motor vehicle.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5323-S.SL) ***

(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the first degree if he or she possesses stolen property, other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, which exceeds five thousand dollars in value.

(2) Possessing stolen property in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 2009 c 431 s 12; 2007 c 199 s 6; 1995 c 129 s 14 (Initiative Measure No. 159); 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.150.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2007 c 199: See notes following RCW 9A.56.065.

Findings and intent—Short title—Severability—Captions not law—1995 c 129: See notes following RCW 9.94A.510.

Property crime database, liability: RCW 4.24.340.